District of Columbia statutes.
50-211.07

Employee transportation.

(a)

On or before December 31, 2012, the Mayor shall transmit a report to the Council discussing:

(1)

How District government employees travel within the Washington, D.C. metropolitan region for work-related business;

(2)

How the cost of work-related travel could be decreased;

(3)

Whether the use of alternative transportation, such as Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (“WMATA”) services, Circulator, Bikeshare, and taxicabs by District government employees for work-related business could be increased and, if so, how; and

(4)

Which District agencies offer transit benefits to employees, and to which employees.

(b)

On or before March 15, 2013, the Members of the Council shall submit and the Secretary to the Council shall compile a report to the Council discussing:

(1)

How Council employees travel within the District for work-related business;

(2)

How the cost of work-related travel could be decreased;

(3)

Whether the use of alternative transportation, such as WMATA services, Circulator, Bikeshare, and taxicabs by Council employees for work-related business could be increased and, if so, how; and

(4)

Whether the Council offers transit benefits to employees.

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-223, § 107, 59 DCR 13537
This section is referenced in § 50-211.02.
Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-223 provided that §§ 101, 102, 104, 105(a), 105(b), 106, 107, 201(a), 201(b), 201(c), 202, 203, and 301 of the act shall apply as of Mar. 5, 2013.